Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2262.01
Stage, defined.

Stage shall mean a designation II, III, IV, or V assigned to a state or area of a state by the United States Department of Agriculture with respect to the prevalence of pseudorabies contained therein.

Laws 1996, LB 965, § 7.